ASPELL6/portugues/pt_PT.aff
SFX j Y 25
SFX j   0              izar           l
SFX j   e              izar           e
SFX j   o              izar           o
SFX j   a              zar            ia
SFX j   a              izar           [^i]a
SFX j   0              izado          l
SFX j   e              izado          e
SFX j   o              izado          o
SFX j   a              zado           ia
SFX j   a              izado          [^i]a
SFX j   0              izada          l
SFX j   e              izada          e
SFX j   o              izada          o
SFX j   a              zada           ia
SFX j   a              izada          [^i]a
SFX j   0              izados         l
SFX j   e              izados         e
SFX j   o              izados         o
SFX j   a              zados          ia
SFX j   a              izados         [^i]a
SFX j   0              izadas         l
SFX j   e              izadas         e
SFX j   o              izadas         o
SFX j   a              zadas          ia
SFX j   a              izados         [^i]a

SFX G Y 29
SFX G   o              ice            [^Çgc]o
SFX G   0              0              Ço
SFX G   go             guice          go
SFX G   co             quice          co
SFX G   a              ice            [^Çgc]a
SFX G   0              0              Ça
SFX G   ga             guice          ga
SFX G   ca             quice          ca
SFX G   e              ice            e
SFX G   0              ice            r
SFX G   0              ice            [^v][^q]l
SFX G   vel            bilice         [^ÁÍ]vel
SFX G   0              0              Ável
SFX G   0              0              Ível
SFX G   z              cice           z
SFX G   o              ices           [^Çgc]o
SFX G   0              0              Ço
SFX G   go             guices         go
SFX G   co             quices         co
SFX G   a              ices           [^Çgc]a
SFX G   0              0              Ça
SFX G   ga             guices         ga
SFX G   ca             quices         ca
SFX G   0              ices           [^v][^q]l
SFX G   e              ices           e
SFX G   0              ices           r
SFX G   vel            bilices        [^ÁÍ]vel
SFX G   0              0              Ável
SFX G   0              0              Ível

SFX J Y 7
SFX J   r              cionismo       [ai]r
SFX J   er             icionismo      er
SFX J   0              0ar            ar
SFX J   0              0ar            ar
SFX J   0              0a             a
SFX J   0              0o             o
SFX J   0              0e             e
